Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 89 Uniform School District Grant, Gift and Donation Acceptance and Expenditure Act of 2009

16-89-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Grant, Gift and Donation Acceptance and Expenditure Act of 2009.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.

16-89-2.
Findings of fact.

The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:

The present financial resources of cities, towns and the state are stretched to their limit with regard to providing adequate funding for education, yet the need to fund public education at its present level remains unabated.

School districts, school departments, and school committees are limited in their ability to seek alternative sources of funding for budgetary items outside of the annual appropriation of state aid to education and municipal tax levies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.

16-89-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is:

To enable and allow school districts, school departments, and school committees to accept grants, gifts and donations from any private individual, public or private business entity, any government or governmental subdivision thereof, including quasi-public agencies; and

To restrict the expenditure of such grants, gifts and donations to a specific school district, school department, or school committee programming or a facility related need as specified according to the terms of the gift, grant or donation as conditioned by the grantor, giftor or donor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.

16-89-4.
Grants, gifts and donations — Acceptance and expenditure.

Any school district, school department or school committee may accept any and all gifts, grants and donations of money, equipment, supplies, materials, services and any other contribution of value, conditional or otherwise, from any local, state, or federal government or governmental subdivision thereof, including quasi-public agencies of any kind, or from any person, firm, association, foundation, corporation or business entity for use in any program or facility thereof; provided, however, that the gift, grant or donation is utilized and disposed of pursuant to the express terms or conditions stipulated by such gift, grant or donation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.

16-89-5.
Grant, gifts and donation — Fiduciary responsibility of municipalities — Accounting.

Any amount of money received by any municipality for expenditure pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited by the chief finance officer of the municipality into the municipal treasury in a separate, restricted receipt account identifiable to the particular grant, gift or donation and shall be expended solely by and upon the demand of the school district, school department or school committee in accord with the express terms and conditions of said grant, gift or donation.

Any account established hereunder shall be interest bearing and any interest on funds so deposited shall remain with and become part of the grant, gift or donation and shall be expended as part of said grant, gift or donation.

Any other grant, gift or donation of any kind, other than money, including, but not limited to equipment, supplies, materials, services and any other contribution of value may be received directly by school districts, school departments, or school committees so long as said grant, gift or donation shall be accounted for from time of receipt to time of disposition, and so long as direct receipt of such is not otherwise prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.

16-89-6.
Effect on annual municipal appropriation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean that the present annual municipal appropriation to any school district, school department or school committee shall be or may be decreased or diminished by the amount of any grant, gift or donation made pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 174, § 1.